Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
Where the record did not demonstrate that the exculpatory value was apparent before the evidence, a list of 12 other witnesses gathered at scene by a highway patrol officer, was lost or that the defendant was unable to obtain comparable evidence by any other measurably available means, and where there was nothing to evidence any bad faith on the part of the investigating officers, the failure of the state to make this evidence available to the defendant did not violate his right to due process of law. Young v. State, 849 P.2d 754,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. Apr. 21, 1993).

Arbitrary limitation upon party's right to call rebuttal witnesses
unconstitutional infringement. —

The court's decision, in a proceeding seeking modification of a divorce decree, to limit a party's right to call rebuttal witnesses, made without inquiring whether there was anything new to present, was in error under the Rules of Evidence and infringed upon the constitutional right to be heard. However, since there was nothing which indicated that the rebuttal witness to be called had, in fact, anything new to say, the error was harmless. Hall v. Hall, 708 P.2d 416,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 589

(Wyo. 1985).

Inadmissibility of victim impact statements in death penalty
cases. —

Neither the Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-102

death penalty statute nor Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

7-21-101

through 103 general victim impact statutes authorize the introduction of victim impact evidence during capital sentencing, and the trial court errs in allowing its introduction; such error, however, is subject to harmless error analysis. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003); Harlow v. State, 2003 WY 47, 70 P.3d 179,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. May 20, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 970, 124 S. Ct. 438, 157 L. Ed. 2d 317, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 7776 (U.S. 2003).

Instructions. —

General instructions on the matter of criminal-intent burden of proof and the necessity to prove all elements of the crime beyond a reasonable doubt are insufficient to meet the due process requirements which dictate that the defendant will have his theory affirmatively presented to the jury by way of instruction. Goodman v. State, 573 P.2d 400,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 322

(Wyo. 1977).

Instruction differentiating between resisting arrest, escaping
detention. —

Where the defendant escaped while officers attempted to arrest him, he was entitled to an instruction which differentiated between resisting arrest and escaping detention following an arrest. Oien v. State, 797 P.2d 544,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1990).

“Mistake of Fact” jury instructions. —

In a prosecution for receiving or concealing a stolen car, where the defendant twice testified that a co-defendant told her he bought the car, the defendant's testimony must be taken as entirely true for purposes of testing the competency of evidence needed to support a theory of defense jury instruction; the defendant's testimony was competent evidence to support a “Mistake of Fact” instruction, and the court's refusal to give this instruction violated federal and Wyoming due process. Stagner v. State, 842 P.2d 520,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1992).

No right to jury nullification. —

Jury nullification, or the unreviewable power of a jury to acquit even in the face of overwhelming evidence of guilt, is not a right enjoyed by a criminal defendant and, therefore, did not require that a fined violator of a dog licensing ordinance be afforded a jury trial in contravention of the clear provisions of this rule. Nollsch v. Rock Springs, 724 P.2d 447,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 603

(Wyo. 1986).

Failure to offer lesser included offense instruction. —

The failure to give a lesser included offense instruction which is supported by the evidence constitutes an error implicating the due process guarantees under this section. The “statutory elements” test is the one to invoke to determine whether a lesser included offense instruction under Rule 31(c), W.R.Cr.P. is appropriate. Under this test, one offense is not necessarily included in another unless the elements of the lesser offense are a subset of the elements of the charged offense; and where the lesser offense requires an element not required for the greater offense, no instruction is to be given under Rule 31(c). State v. Keffer, 860 P.2d 1118,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1993).

Lesser included offense within jury verdict sustained. —

Even though the jury incorrectly concluded that the necessary elements were present to elevate the defendant's crime from burglary to aggravated burglary, an examination of the record disclosed there was sufficient finding that each of the elements of burglary was met. Therefore, the defendant's conviction for the crime of aggravated burglary was set aside, but his conviction was sustained as to the lesser included offense of burglary. Such an action was not a violation of the defendant's due process right under U.S. Const., amend. XIV, § 1 and Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 6, or of his right to a trial by jury under Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 9. Simonds v. State, 762 P.2d 1189,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1988).

No due process violation in considering a broad range of reports
and information before imposing sentence. —

Trial court did not violate defendant's due process rights under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 6 in sentencing defendant to consecutive five-to eight-year prison terms for his convictions on four counts of forgery because defendant's sentence did not exceed the maximum penalty provided in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-3-602(b) and defendant's trial counsel had withdrawn her objection to the remaining disputed items in a pre-sentence investigation report. W.R.Cr.P. 32(a) specifically permits information about the prior criminal record of the defendant and his characteristics to be considered by the trial court before imposing sentence, and the trial court, in exercising its discretion, may consider a broad range of reports and information. Davis v. State, 2005 WY 93, 117 P.3d 454,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2005).

Presentence investigation. —

Defendant's due process rights were not violated by the procedures surrounding a presentence report under Wyo. R. Crim. P. 32; a foreign probation report was properly considered, a statement that defendant did not accept responsibility was not inaccurate, the report was made in a “nonargumentative style,” the failure to address alternatives to prison was corrected in an amended report, and there was no requirement that members of defendant's family be contacted. Gorseth v. State, 2006 WY 109, 141 P.3d 698,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2006).

Mere submission of a victim impact statement and presentence investigation report that contains statements from individuals who may be beyond those affected by the charged crimes does not without more constitute a procedural error in sentencing or prosecutorial misconduct; therefore, in a case involving sexual assault and indecent acts with a minor, error was not shown based on the fact that other statements were included.
Hubbard v. State, 2008 WY 12, 175 P.3d 625,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2008).

Mental evaluation to determine mental competency. —

Defendant underwent a mental evaluation which concluded he was competent, and he did not contest the results of the evaluation or request an additional evaluation; after the evaluation was completed, there was no new evidence suggesting defendant's capacity had diminished. Thus, the district court complied with the mental examination requirements set out in the statutes, and defendant's due process rights were not violated. Follett v. State, 2006 WY 47, 132 P.3d 1155,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2006), reh'g denied,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. May 3, 2006).

Restriction on driving privileges constitutional. —

The classification in § 31-7-105(f)(iii)(A), which mandates that no second-time Driving-While-Under-the-Influence offender can be eligible to receive a discretionary grant of limited driving privileges, is constitutional under the due process guarantee of this section. Moreno v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 775 P.2d 497,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1989).

Procedures to eliminate arbitrariness in imposition of death
penalty. —

In order to satisfy the requirements of Furman v. Georgia, 408 U.S. 238, 92 S. Ct. 2726, 33 L. Ed. 2d 346, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 169 (1972), the sentencing authority's discretion must be guided and channeled by requiring examination of specific factors that argue in favor of or against imposition of the death penalty, thus eliminating total arbitrariness and capriciousness in its imposition. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

Modification of verdict in criminal case by supreme court.
—

Modification by supreme court of verdict of murder in second degree to one of manslaughter was authorized and not infringement of due process. State v. Sorrentino, 36 Wyo. 111, 253 P. 14,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1927).

Transfer of prisoner from industrial institute to penitentiary.
—

Statute empowering board of charities and reform to transfer prisoner in industrial institute to penitentiary if it should appear he had been previously convicted of crime does not deny due process. Uram v. Roach, 47 Wyo. 335, 37 P.2d 793,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1934).

Comments by judge. —

In a murder case, there was no evidence in the transcript or in the record that the court's comments admonishing counsel for their conduct caused prejudice and deprived the defendant of a fair trial. Moreover, the court's comments did not interfere with the attorney-client relationship, so as to deprive the defendant of the right to a fair trial, where the court did not express an opinion on the appropriateness of the defense strategy until after the defendant indicated that the defendant would not pursue that strategy. In addition, with respect to the court's merely reiterating an argument made to it by the prosecution, the defendant's contention that the court committed misconduct by supplying the state with the basis for the admission of evidence was contrary to the record and without merit. Also, the court did not commit misconduct by specifically directing a particular statement towards the prosecutor, where the statement was not a comment on the evidence, but rather, was an expression of frustration on the part of the court over what it perceived as unnecessary and dilatory tactics by the prosecution. Belden v. State, 2003 WY 89, 73 P.3d 1041,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. Aug. 26, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1165, 124 S. Ct. 1179, 157 L. Ed. 2d 1212, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 898 (U.S. 2004).

Failure to appoint counsel at juvenile proceeding. —

Mother did not show how the failure to appoint her counsel at an initial juvenile proceeding violated her due process rights regarding termination of parental rights proceedings; termination proceedings are entirely separate and distinct from neglect proceedings, deriving their respective genesis from separate statutes and requiring different burdens of proof. MN v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In the Interest of
MN), 2003 WY 135, 78 P.3d 232,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2003).

No due process violation in raising visitation issue during
shelter care hearing. —

Mother's procedural due process rights under this section were not violated even though the mother was not given notice that a visitation issue was going to arise at an initial hearing; the relevant statute gave notice to any parent that issues involving the conditions of shelter care could arise at any time, and the mother was given meaningful notice and opportunity to be heard when she challenged the trial court’s ruling on visitation after the hearing.
DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re "H" Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. Jan. 13, 2004).

Sentencing considerations. —

Defendant's due process rights under U.S. Const. amend XIV, § 1 and Wyo. Const. art. I, § 6 were not violated when uncharged activity was considered by a trial court during sentencing for a drug offense, where the evidence was reliable and accurate based on an officer's involvement and the information was taped and corroborated. Peden v. State, 2006 WY 26, 129 P.3d 869,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2006).

Due process not denied in re-licensure hearing by the Wyoming
Mental Health Professions Licensing Board. —

Where appellant was denied relicensure of his clinical social work license, he was not denied due process by the Wyoming Mental Health Professions Licensing Board's ruling that evidence concerning matters that occurred after the license application was denied was admissible because issues are not limited to the matters reflected in the notice of hearing and appellant had timely notice of the hearing. In re Licensure of Jerry Penny v. State ex rel. Wyo. Mental Health Professions Licensing Bd., 2005 WY 117, 120 P.3d 152,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2005).

Failure to provide father with opportunity to be heard prior to termination of parental rights. —

In a termination of parental rights action, the trial court violated the father’s due process rights when it determined the best interests of the child without providing the father an opportunity to be heard. The hearing on summary judgment was limited to whether grounds for termination existed and there was no indication in the record that the related, and essential, issue of whether termination was in the best interests of the child was raised or considered. In re NRAE v. Dep't of Family Servs., 2020 WY 121, 472 P.3d 374,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2020).

Sex offender registration requirements.—

Registration
requirements of the Wyoming Sexual Offender Registration Act did not
violate defendant juvenile's due process rights, substantive or procedural,
under the Wyoming or U.S. constitutions, as defendant did not content
that there was a fundamental right at issue and procedural due process
did not entitle defendant to a second hearing to demonstrate he was
not a high risk to reoffend. Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Vagueness.

Provisions of the Wyoming Code of Judicial Conduct alleged to have been violated by a judge's refusal to marry same -sex couples were not void for vagueness where she was not being disciplined for her expression of her religious beliefs, but for her conduct in refusing to impartially perform her judicial functions, and an ordinary judge would have understood that refusal to conduct some marriages on the basis of the sexual orientation of the couple did not comply with the Code of Judicial Conduct. Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 639, 199 L. Ed. 2d 527, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 103 (U.S. 2018).

Filing of lien to recover cost of Medicaid benefits.

In a case in which the State filed a lien against two properties to recover the cost of Medicaid benefits paid on behalf of a decedent, the decedent's sons were not denied due process of law, as they were provided notice and an opportunity to be heard regarding the validity of two quitclaim deeds. Gheen v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 70, 326 P.3d 918,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2014), reh'g denied,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. July 1, 2014).